apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="abejokl/is__n">
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>io</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iui</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iu</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>in</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iams</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ius</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iais</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iuose</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>isna</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="abejotoj/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oj</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>on</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oms</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omis</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ose</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>osna</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="abiturien/tė__n">
      <e><p><l>tė</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tės</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tei</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tę</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėje</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tėn</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tės</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čių</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėms</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėmis</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėse</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tėsna</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tės</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
       
    <pardef n="azot/as__n_m">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="straip/snis__n_m">
      <e><p><l>nsio</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiui</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snį</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snyje</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sni</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiu</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snis</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsių</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiams</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsius</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiuose</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiai</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiais</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nsiai</l><r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="abėc/lė__n_f">
      <e><p><l>lės</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lei</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lę</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lėje</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėle</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lė</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lių</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lėms</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėles</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lėse</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lės</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lėmis</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lės</l><r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="auksas"><i>auks</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="choras"><i>chor</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="azotas"><i>azot</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pienas"><i>pien</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uranas"><i>uran</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="abėclė"><i>abėc</i><par n="abėc/lė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="švinas"><i>švin</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="straipsnis"><i>straip</i><par n="straip/snis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sidabras"><i>sidabr</i><par n="azot/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="atlygis"><i>atlyg</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bendraautoris"><i>bendraautor</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="būgnelis"><i>būgnel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dirvožemis"><i>dirvožem</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="festivalis"><i>festival</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyvsidabris"><i>gyvsidabr</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kabelis"><i>kabel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaušelis"><i>kaušel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kotelis"><i>kotel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laipsnis"><i>laipsn</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lęšis"><i>lęš</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modulis"><i>modul</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="numeris"><i>numer</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakaušis"><i>pakauš</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pokalbis"><i>pokalb</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protrūkis"><i>protrūk</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sandėlis"><i>sandėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spalis"><i>spal</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tolis"><i>tol</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velionis"><i>velion</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šokis"><i>šok</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apyvarta"><i>apyvart</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baudžiava"><i>baudžiav</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delegacija"><i>delegacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekologija"><i>ekologij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografija"><i>fotografij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heraldika"><i>heraldik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="joja"><i>joj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klasika"><i>klasik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreida"><i>kreid</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lupa"><i>lup</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modifikacija"><i>modifikacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nėščia"><i>nėšči</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paskola"><i>paskol</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pornografija"><i>pornografij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puošyba"><i>puošyb</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samprata"><i>samprat</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skruzdėda"><i>skruzdėd</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sėjomaina"><i>sėjomain</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuštuma"><i>tuštum</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vibracija"><i>vibracij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amerikietė"><i>amerikie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asistentė"><i>asisten</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avietė"><i>avie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dalelytė"><i>dalely</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dirigentė"><i>dirigen</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvarvietė"><i>dvarvie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gegutė"><i>gegu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grupuotė"><i>grupuo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaimynystė"><i>kaimynys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaulytė"><i>kiauly</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunigaikštytė"><i>kunigaikšty</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mečetė"><i>meče</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="našlaitė"><i>našlai</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piliavietė"><i>piliavie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prezidentė"><i>preziden</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saulutė"><i>saulu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="suirutė"><i>suiru</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaikystė"><i>vaikys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voveraitė"><i>voverai</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žurnalistė"><i>žurnalis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
